Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,361
All-terrain
vehicle; utility-type vehicle; accident;
report required.

If an accident results in the
death of any person or in the injury of any person which requires the treatment
of the person by a physician, the operator of each all-terrain vehicle or utility-type vehicle involved
in the accident shall give notice of the accident in the same manner as provided
in section 60-699.

Laws 1987, LB 80, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2807;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 457;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 51;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 45.